Washington statutes.
RCW 44.05.060

Members—Political activities prohibited.

No member of the commission may:

(1) Campaign for elective office while a member of the commission;

(2) Actively participate in or contribute to any political campaign of any candidate for state or federal elective office while a member of the commission; or

(3) Hold or campaign for a seat in the state house of representatives, the state senate, or congress for two years after the effective date of the plan.

[ 1984 c 13 s 3; 1983 c 16 s 6.]